Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3634, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3634. A. The total amount of rebate payments
conditionally pre-qualified by the Department of Commerce each
fiscal year with respect to any of the incentives authorized
pursuant to this act shall not exceed Thirty Million Dollars
($30,000,000.00). Projects not conditionally pre-qualified for
rebate payments due to the limitations provided in this section may
be conditionally pre-qualified by the Department in subsequent
fiscal years.
B. The amount of rebate payments conditionally pre-qualified by
the Department of Commerce each fiscal year with respect to any of
the incentives authorized pursuant to this act shall not exceed:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4215 Page 1

1. Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00)
for production projects with total expenditures of less than Seven
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00); and
2. Twenty-two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($22,500,000.00) for production projects with total expenditures of
Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00) or more.
C. A production project shall have total expenditures of Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or more to be eligible for the rebate
payments provided in this act or Twenty Thousand Dollars
($20,000.00) for projects filmed outside this state as provided for
in Section 3636 of this title.
D. In any fiscal year if the amount of rebate payments
conditionally pre-qualified by the Department of Commerce are less
than the limitations provided in this section, the excess rebate
payments not utilized shall be added to subsequent fiscal year's
limitation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 4215 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ______ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 4215 Page 3